utilities/dictionaries/mk_MK-Macedonian.aff
FLAG num
SFX 3186 Y 1
SFX 3186 и ум и
SFX 2064 Y 1
SFX 2064 о увајте о
SFX 4562 Y 1
SFX 4562 а оста а
SFX 1562 Y 1
SFX 1562 е ин е
SFX 86 Y 1
SFX 86 а ува а
SFX 257 Y 1
SFX 257 и увано и
SFX 830 Y 1
SFX 830 а нев а
SFX 4484 Y 1
SFX 4484 и нувал и
SFX 183 Y 1
SFX 183 е ува е
SFX 3504 Y 1
SFX 3504 и лница и
SFX 2821 Y 1
SFX 2821 а етите а
SFX 1253 Y 1
SFX 1253 и оста и
SFX 41 Y 1
SFX 41 и ува и
SFX 3268 Y 1
SFX 3268 о увано о
SFX 3493 Y 1
SFX 3493 а сково а
SFX 1213 Y 1
SFX 1213 и нев и
SFX 554 Y 1
SFX 554 о ува о
SFX 514 Y 1
SFX 514 а ела а
SFX 1589 Y 1
SFX 1589 и увачкиот и
SFX 1481 Y 1
SFX 1481 и сково и
SFX 4662 Y 1
SFX 4662 а еј а
SFX 3272 Y 1
SFX 3272 а етана а
SFX 2508 Y 1
SFX 2508 и лак и
SFX 1659 Y 1
SFX 1659 г шката г
SFX 4332 Y 1
SFX 4332 л сен л
SFX 520 Y 1
SFX 520 а ете а
SFX 3945 Y 1
SFX 3945 а нувам а
SFX 2977 Y 1
SFX 2977 л њата л
SFX 1433 Y 1
SFX 1433 к штво к
SFX 2389 Y 1
SFX 2389 о сково о
SFX 4335 Y 1
SFX 4335 а ења а
SFX 954 Y 1
SFX 954 н њата н
SFX 4483 Y 1
SFX 4483 и нувам и
SFX 3324 Y 1
SFX 3324 а ваат а
SFX 3323 Y 1
SFX 3323 а еник а
SFX 593 Y 1
SFX 593 а ениве а
SFX 4063 Y 1
SFX 4063 к чев к
SFX 527 Y 1
SFX 527 а еле а
SFX 3363 Y 1
SFX 3363 о чев о
SFX 2910 Y 1
SFX 2910 и увачката и
SFX 3149 Y 1
SFX 3149 а вање а
SFX 1258 Y 1
SFX 1258 а ење а
SFX 831 Y 1
SFX 831 а неа а
SFX 2679 Y 1
SFX 2679 и ковска и
SFX 2975 Y 1
SFX 2975 л њено л
SFX 1192 Y 1
SFX 1192 и неа и
SFX 4330 Y 1
SFX 4330 к чел к
SFX 986 Y 1
SFX 986 н њено н
SFX 2982 Y 1
SFX 2982 а ичен а
SFX 1682 Y 1
SFX 1682 к чна к
SFX 1752 Y 1
SFX 1752 к чни к
SFX 3712 Y 1
SFX 3712 а ираат а
SFX 2413 Y 1
SFX 2413 и кови и
SFX 4944 Y 1
SFX 4944 а ести а
SFX 1754 Y 1
SFX 1754 а ите а
SFX 3270 Y 1
SFX 3270 е ираат е
SFX 1266 Y 1
SFX 1266 а уваното а
SFX 3942 Y 1
SFX 3942 к чкото к
SFX 123 Y 1
SFX 123 е иња е
SFX 600 Y 1
SFX 600 а ениов а
SFX 3711 Y 1
SFX 3711 а ирање а
SFX 1603 Y 1
SFX 1603 а ката а
SFX 273 Y 1
SFX 273 и уваното и
SFX 2815 Y 1
SFX 2815 г шкине г
SFX 2395 Y 1
SFX 2395 а ската а
SFX 928 Y 1
SFX 928 а ица а
SFX 3949 Y 1
SFX 3949 е ирање е
SFX 1169 Y 1
SFX 1169 е ката е
SFX 3398 Y 1
SFX 3398 о уваното о
SFX 792 Y 1
SFX 792 и ката и
SFX 1753 Y 1
SFX 1753 е ица е
SFX 816 Y 1
SFX 816 и ската и
SFX 1890 Y 1
SFX 1890 о ската о
SFX 1544 Y 1
SFX 1544 г шкиот г
SFX 1808 Y 1
SFX 1808 а ети а
SFX 3503 Y 1
SFX 3503 а навме а
SFX 3500 Y 1
SFX 3500 а невте а
SFX 4099 Y 1
SFX 4099 е за е
SFX 2820 Y 1
SFX 2820 и оните и
SFX 2238 Y 1
SFX 2238 и чен и
SFX 854 Y 1
SFX 854 к чен к
SFX 4560 Y 1
SFX 4560 и раат и
SFX 1681 Y 1
SFX 1681 к чно к
SFX 2889 Y 1
SFX 2889 и тат и
SFX 4117 Y 1
SFX 4117 и осување и
SFX 3898 Y 1
SFX 3898 а нувала а
SFX 3551 Y 1
SFX 3551 а каат а
SFX 1274 Y 1
SFX 1274 а уваниве а
SFX 3756 Y 1
SFX 3756 е каат е
SFX 4658 Y 1
SFX 4658 т чи т
SFX 3099 Y 1
SFX 3099 а етото а
SFX 4430 Y 1
SFX 4430 и нувала и
SFX 4559 Y 1
SFX 4559 и рање и
SFX 3895 Y 1
SFX 3895 а нувате а
SFX 2856 Y 1
SFX 2856 а ниов а
SFX 1096 Y 1
SFX 1096 и каат и
SFX 4093 Y 1
SFX 4093 и та и
SFX 4153 Y 1
SFX 4153 а нувања а
SFX 280 Y 1
SFX 280 и уваниве и
SFX 829 Y 1
SFX 829 а нел а
SFX 4875 Y 1
SFX 4875 а ењава а
SFX 4427 Y 1
SFX 4427 и нувате и
SFX 640 Y 1
SFX 640 и ниов и
SFX 3643 Y 1
SFX 3643 о уваниве о
SFX 2091 Y 1
SFX 2091 а кине а
SFX 1900 Y 1
SFX 1900 а ното а
SFX 3496 Y 1
SFX 3496 а скине а
SFX 1191 Y 1
SFX 1191 и нел и
SFX 4369 Y 1
SFX 4369 в ла в
SFX 1901 Y 1
SFX 1901 и кање и
SFX 1488 Y 1
SFX 1488 е кине е
SFX 1148 Y 1
SFX 1148 а нуваат а
SFX 3663 Y 1
SFX 3663 а нувале а
SFX 532 Y 1
SFX 532 и ното и
SFX 1055 Y 1
SFX 1055 и кине и
SFX 4268 Y 1
SFX 4268 а иште а
SFX 1690 Y 1
SFX 1690 и ла и
SFX 1817 Y 1
SFX 1817 и ли и
SFX 1452 Y 1
SFX 1452 и скине и
SFX 4661 Y 1
SFX 4661 к ла к
SFX 4368 Y 1
SFX 4368 к ли к
SFX 3010 Y 1
SFX 3010 а ето а
SFX 2481 Y 1
SFX 2481 е иште е
SFX 2386 Y 1
SFX 2386 к чните к
SFX 1350 Y 1
SFX 1350 и нуваат и
SFX 4429 Y 1
SFX 4429 и нувале и
SFX 2572 Y 1
SFX 2572 и овиот и
SFX 2393 Y 1
SFX 2393 о скине о
SFX 2202 Y 1
SFX 2202 а скиот а
SFX 599 Y 1
SFX 599 а енион а
SFX 4267 Y 1
SFX 4267 е киот е
SFX 836 Y 1
SFX 836 а нување а
SFX 1003 Y 1
SFX 1003 л те л
SFX 115 Y 1
SFX 115 н те н
SFX 2901 Y 1
SFX 2901 л ња л
SFX 735 Y 1
SFX 735 и скиот и
SFX 1058 Y 1
SFX 1058 а ци а
SFX 814 Y 1
SFX 814 н ња н
SFX 2273 Y 1
SFX 2273 и ковски и
SFX 993 Y 1
SFX 993 и нување и
SFX 1272 Y 1
SFX 1272 а уваниов а
SFX 4371 Y 1
SFX 4371 в га в
SFX 3940 Y 1
SFX 3940 к чнана к
SFX 1629 Y 1
SFX 1629 о скиот о
SFX 535 Y 1
SFX 535 а ело а
SFX 1689 Y 1
SFX 1689 и ци и
SFX 370 Y 1
SFX 370 к ца к
SFX 112 Y 1
SFX 112 к ци к
SFX 3897 Y 1
SFX 3897 а нувало а
SFX 278 Y 1
SFX 278 и уваниов и
SFX 1535 Y 1
SFX 1535 и ле и
