utilities/dictionaries/mk_MK-Macedonian.dic
гаве/10,19,79,465,501,1562,2056
ѓури/156,380,605,1445,2273,2302,2413,2679
штук/2,3,9,15,21,26,28,30,34,35,36,181,190,191,233,241,251,258,259,289,295,297,322,2099,4661
гино/24,29,497,3363
пеле/5,10,19,35,52,79,142,254,335,551,614,764,1170,1562,1660,2653
скрои/1,12,19,22,31,32,33,37,39,40,59,2889,4941
надои/1,12,19,31,32,33,37,39,40,59,1535,1552,3504,4560
смрди/1,12,39,41,53,59,71,1535,1690,3386
поита/1,2,12,13,19,22,31,32,33,37,39,40,46,49,54,61,86,96,155,498,770,855,1095,1264,1570,1900,2853,2854,2855,2856,2857,2858,2859,2860
голта/1,2,12,31,32,37,40,49,56,61,67,68,72,74,75,76,77,85,104,105,818,829,830,831,832,833,836,842,1148,1195,2139,2225,2363,2515,2542,2667,2668,2669,2670,2671,2672,2673,2674,2675,2676,3321,3500,3501,3502,3503,3544,3545,3546,3547,3548,3549,3550,3593,3594,4890
исмаи/22,172,292,480,1817
фајде/293,450,1753
гајда/317,318,321,450,480,878,1217,2605,2981,3320,3553,4662
суфле/317,321,553,748,817,3174,3270,3949
крева/344,948,1178,1571,1645,1808,2022,2091,2092,2140,2821,3100,3101
дотов/390,881,1635,1750,2664,3996,4371
перја/47,142,166,170,494,1193,1820,4944
вјаса/5,13,18,142,498,745,818,829,830,831,832,833,842
засеа/5,8,19,22,25,27,31,32,33,35,37,40,46,47,51,52,55,57,58,59,60,62,63,64,65,66,328,468,514,520,527,535,536,540,546,547,745,829,830,831,836,842,1570,2180,3149,3321,3500,3501,3545,3546,3547,3594,3845,4664
виоли/51,255,661,2988,4093,4182,4379,4906
преки/541,924,939,1186,1470,1513,1638,1672,1692,1712,1733,1734,1843,1844,1845,2571,3773,4117
свиња/707,1183,1754,2202,2390,2395,2505,2819,3022,3269,3492,3493,3494,3495,3496,3497,3498,4268
нагла/847,1028,1158,1297,1431,1825,2043,2103,4561,4562
ситна/85,4335,4871,4872,4873,4874,4875
акчии/98,99,3504
засега/1,2,5,8,12,13,18,19,22,27,31,32,33,35,37,39,40,46,47,49,51,52,54,55,56,57,58,60,61,62,63,64,65,66,67,68,72,74,75,76,77,499,536,745,836,1095,1148,2225,2542,3663,3873,3874,3875,3894,3895,3896,3897,3898,3943,3944,3945,3946,3947,3948
магаре/11,16,123,381,607,679,772,1444,1753,2481,2823
потупа/13,3551
припек/14,32,94,101,111,112,576,681,854,972,1931,2888,3541,4063,4330,4425,4556,4633
проток/1752
намера/176,342,653,677,1266
оглуви/19,22,41,53,59,71,705,969,993,1175,1191,1192,1213,1214,1257,1350
стрели/1901
сознав/2,106,158,159,162,181,195,234,245,266,281,306,307,312,334,346,354,356,418,427,455,474,475,479,483,484,4369
провик/2,15,35,158,190,191,233,241,251,258,259,289,295,297,4368
поплак/2,3,21,30,94,101,111,116,159,162,195,854,972,2888,4063,4330,4425,4556,4633
наплат/2,3,5,8,13,21,30,35,50,51,52,55,70,80,93,94,101,102,106,111,143,152,161,163,165,169,171,173,174,175,178,184,188,196,197,199,200,201,202,204,207,208,210,211,212,214,215,216,217,219,220,225,231,261,269,300,311,338,364,371,376,389,410,692,2887,3843,4658
смрдел/2,7,9,269,375,1003,1111,2133,2345,2851,2901,2975,2976,2977,2978,2979,3008
прејал/2,7,9,4332
болоња/2395
бразда/25,27,1193,1258,1820
праски/2572
страши/31,33,764,825,1535,1690,3386
орбита/4,22,305,419,714,2634,3712
чкембе/48,123,395,450,3199
свлече/5,12,31,32,33,35,37,39,40,47,49,51,52,55,57,58,60,62,63,64,65,66,1188,2481,2604,3756
натпеа/5,8,19,22,25,27,31,32,33,35,37,40,46,47,51,52,55,57,58,59,60,62,63,64,65,66,155,328,468,514,520,527,535,540,546,547,2180,3149,3324
пропеа/5,8,19,22,25,27,31,32,33,35,37,40,46,47,51,52,55,57,58,59,60,62,63,64,65,66,328,468,514,520,527,535,540,546,547,2180,3149,3324
кротки/6,14,15,17,20,3186
стомак/6,14,20,89,112,505,854,1681,1682,1838,1839,2387,3146,3754,3940,3941
протек/6,14,31,32,33,94,101,111,190,199,216,217,219,220,225,226,227,228,229,230,231,235,237,238,239,242,243,261,267,268,282,283,576,623,681,854,972,1176,1682,1798,1907,1931,2888,3146,3541,4063,4330,4425,4556,4633
бодрен/794,814,875,954,964,965,986,996
недели/942,2272,2273,2398,2679,2741
заслужи/1,12,19,22,31,32,33,37,39,40,59,291,292,309,333,420,442,532,619,625,626,627,633,638,639,640,651
избледи/1,12,19,22,31,32,33,37,39,40,59,705,1350
намовне/1,2,19,22,183,368
прошара/1,2,5,8,12,13,19,22,25,27,31,32,33,35,37,39,40,46,47,49,51,52,54,55,57,58,60,61,62,63,64,65,66,86,139,222,456,545,552,559,560,561,564,570,571,572,577,578,579,580,582,584,585,586,590,711,712,730,731,732
исплака/1,2,5,8,12,13,19,22,27,31,32,33,35,37,39,40,46,47,49,51,52,54,55,57,58,60,61,62,63,64,65,66,498,499,536,745,818,829,830,831,832,833,836,842,1148
војводи/1,5,15,17,27,41,53,92,103,185,255,285,369,470,661,735,758,786,787,816,1189,1452,1453,1454,1455,1480,1481,1482,1483,1728,2572
монголи/1,59,482,791,792,816,1032,1055,1083,1103,1454,1455,1689
нишлија/1571,1603,2022,2091,2092,2140
застана/2,4,11,19,22,25,31,32,33,37,40,46,86,94,113,139,221,222,299,301,319,320,328,339,348,374,388,408,409,412,468,514,516,520,527,535,540,545,546,547,552,559,560,561,564,570,571,572,577,578,579,580,582,584,585,586,590,711,712,730,731,732
придава/22,32,707,746,1183,1571,1603,2202
пешачел/2851,2975,2976,2977,2978,2979,3008
катарза/2982
одбегна/4,11,31,32,33,37,40,46,113,221,299,301,319,320,339,348,374,388,408,409,412,514,527,535,540,546,547
замисла/4,25,46,328,514,516,527,535,546,547
отплата/4,25,46,328,514,516,527,535,546,547
стрелба/4,4268
обајсни/41
напрега/68,4153
завјаса/8,27,86
планина/928,1406,2904
кривули/98,176,573,1096,1144,1755,1901,3903
симпатии/1,187,2238
прокисне/1,2,19,22,183,368,1188
распушта/1,2,5,8,12,13,18,19,22,25,27,31,32,33,35,37,39,40,46,47,49,51,52,54,55,56,57,58,60,61,62,63,64,65,66,155,328,379,434,456,458,468,504,514,516,517,520,527,535,540,542,546,547,592,593,597,598,599,600,601,602,1131,1160,1754,1821,3026,3323,3950
изработе/1,2,5,8,19,22,27,31,32,33,35,37,40,47,49,51,52,55,57,58,60,62,63,64,65,66,109,189,335,690,1169,1354,1383,1434,1464,1488,1489,2890,4370
кујунџии/1,99,470,735,2508
дирекции/15,17,704,709,816,1454,1455
разгален/2,3,9,21,23,26,28,30,34,36,38,42,43,44,45,69,91,115,127
припадна/2,4,11,19,22,25,31,32,33,37,40,46,113,139,221,222,299,301,319,320,328,339,348,374,388,408,409,412,468,514,516,520,527,535,540,545,546,547,552,559,560,561,564,570,571,572,577,578,579,580,582,584,585,586,590,711,712,730,731,732,928,1332,1377,2103,3322,4269,4334,4562
хронолог/2,6,14,20,89,93,350,391,487,611,1128,1206,1340,1371,1422,1544,1586,1628,1659,1852,2127,2153,2154,2811,2812,2813,2814,2815,2816,2817,2818,3757,3758
невролог/2,6,14,20,89,93,391,487,611,811,1122,1206,1340,1371,1422,1544,1586,1628,1659,1677,1852,2127,2811,2812,2813,2814,2815,2816,2817,2818,3757,3758
прекршок/505,854,2201,2386,2387
дисперзии/1,15,17,187,691,704,709,4559
репатрира/13,18,286,1058,1074
раководен/2,3,9,21,23,26,28,30,34,36,38,42,43,44,45,115,127,435,794,814,875,954,964,965,986,996
пневматик/2,424,505,854,1187
раструбел/2,7,9,1003,1111
константи/291,292,309,333,420,442,532,651,1010
индивидуи/3186
дивиденда/4,5,10,155,1754
измајтапи/41
рекоманда/623,3711
кочанчани/791,792,1032,1034,1055,1083,1103
интеграции/1,15,17,185,187,691,704,709,787,945,995,1443,2820
изобилство/11,554
ранобудник/112,370,544
пренапрега/13,18,499,536,836
соработник/2,6,14,20,89,112,370,424,505,537,1433,1838,1839,1888,2102,2469
токсиколог/2,6,14,20,89,93,391,487,611,1206,1340,1422,1544,1586,1628,1659,1852,2127,2811,2812,2813,2814,2815,2816,2817,2818
крајбрежја/4,5,10,458,3010
кавадарчани/1,15,17,791,792,1032,1055,1083,1103,3318,3999,4000
непристојни/1,6,14,15,17,20,658,1108,1253,2506,3592
моноспитово/1629
градоначалник/2,6,9,14,20,88,89,112,424,505,537,1827,1838,1839,1888,2102,2469,3942
претквалификации/1,99,735,816
престолонаследник/6,112,370,424,537
